Connecticut, session 2026, HB05479.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section, "top-tier
research faculty" means faculty with strong research portfolios and
internationally recognized scholarly reputations, as documented
through recognition such as receipt of prestigious awards and honors,
book publications and citations, research funding or any other means as
determined by the president of The University of Connecticut.
(b) The University of Connecticut shall implement a plan to hire not
fewer than ten new top-tier research faculty on or before June 30, 2029.
Such plan shall include, but need not be limited to, (1) improving
infrastructure, such as laboratory space and equipment, to support such
research faculty, (2) developing an effective recruitment strategy, and
(3) supporting graduate students working for such research faculty.
(c) Not later than July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter until and
LCO 2643 1 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5479
including July 1, 2029, the president of The University of Connecticut
shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to higher education
and employment advancement. Such report shall include the status of
implementing the plan to hire new top-tier research faculty pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section.
Sec. 2. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) For the purposes described in
subsection (b) of this section, the State Bond Commission shall have the
power from time to time to authorize the issuance of bonds of the state
in one or more series and in principal amounts not exceeding in the
aggregate twenty million dollars.
(b) The proceeds of the sale of such bonds, to the extent of the amount
stated in subsection (a) of this section, shall be used by The University
of Connecticut for the purpose of improving infrastructure, such as
laboratory space and equipment, to recruit new top-tier research faculty
pursuant to section 1 of this act.
(c) All provisions of section 3-20 of the general statutes, or the exercise
of any right or power granted thereby, that are not inconsistent with the
provisions of this section are hereby adopted and shall apply to all
bonds authorized by the State Bond Commission pursuant to this
section. Temporary notes in anticipation of the money to be derived
from the sale of any such bonds so authorized may be issued in
accordance with section 3-20 of the general statutes and from time to
time renewed. Such bonds shall mature at such time or times not
exceeding twenty years from their respective dates as may be provided
in or pursuant to the resolution or resolutions of the State Bond
Commission authorizing such bonds. None of such bonds shall be
authorized except upon a finding by the State Bond Commission that
there has been filed with it a request for such authorization that is signed
by or on behalf of the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
and states such terms and conditions as said commission, in its
discretion, may require. Such bonds issued pursuant to this section shall
LCO 2643 2 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5479
be general obligations of the state and the full faith and credit of the state
of Connecticut are pledged for the payment of the principal of and
interest on such bonds as the same become due, and accordingly and as
part of the contract of the state with the holders of such bonds,
appropriation of all amounts necessary for punctual payment of such
principal and interest is hereby made, and the State Treasurer shall pay
such principal and interest as the same become due.
Sec. 3. (Effective July 1, 2026) The sum of thirty-five million dollars is
appropriated to The University of Connecticut from the General Fund,
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for personnel costs, including,
but not limited to, salary and fringe benefits, to recruit new top-tier
research faculty pursuant to section 1 of this act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 New section
HED Joint Favorable C/R APP
LCO 2643 3 of 3